[[462, "ambassador", "My stay at the Ambassador East Hotel was a pleasant one. I loved being able to take a quick stroll to Michigan Ave for some shopping. I also loved the Pump Room. What a fun place to hang out and enjoy a Blood Mary. The front desk staff was wonderful with my check in since my reservation was lost. They found me a room immediately even though the city was book up. I thought the rooms were clean and well maintained. The shampoo was great and I decided to take it home with me. I am looking forward to another stay at the Ambassador EAst in the spring when I return to Chicago. \n", 1, 1], [1898, "sheraton", "I was completely unfamiliar with Chicago but needed a place to stay while my husband worked there for a few days and we picked the Sheraton Chicago Hotel and Towers based solely on their internet site. Wow did I get lucky! This is a beautiful hotel with all of amenities I could have hoped for, terrific food, and within walking distance of several interesting places, including the Art Institute of Chicago. Ashley, at the concierge desk, was particularly helpful at guiding a Chicago newbie to the best places to eat ands to see. I will heartily recommend the Sheraton Chicago Hotel and Towers.\n", 1, 1], [518, "fairmont", "This hotel is amazing, I would recommend everyone to stay at least one night here if they had the chance. I stayed here on my first honeymoon and they had all the accommodations I expected plus more. I was floored by the friendliness of the staff and they definitely went the extra mile to make everything perfect without any hassle. The restaurants at the Fairmont were amazing as well. When staying at this Hotel, food and wine at their best are portrayed. If I had to make the choice to stay here again, the only thing that I would do differently is schedule the stay to be twice as long (it was so relaxing!!). Already booked another stay for next year I enjoyed it so much. \n", 1, 1], [1851, "homewood", "I work for a software marketing firm, and that job requires me to travel at least 100 days per year. I spend a large amount of time in hotels. I normally don't write reviews for hotels, but the Homewood Suites by Hilton were above and beyond. Let's start where it matters: the rooms. They are top notch. There's nothing better than walking in to a clean, beautiful rooms after a long day of travel. The beds are among the best I've ever slept in in hotels. The rest of the room is just as nice and makes me feel at home. The price: Low. I looked for similar rooms in the area at other hotels, and everything else was at least 10% more expensive. But you don't get what you pay for here. You get much more than that! The location: Couldn't be better. You want to go to a world class restaurant? That's within walking distance. You want a great shopping experience? Again, walking distance. Anything else you want? Chances are, it's within walking distance. Overall, one of the best hotels I've ever stayed in.\n", 1, 1], [611, "intercontinental", "This is a great place to stay while visiting Chicago. My husband and I went over the holidays to see my family and we stayed at this hotel. We could not have asked for nicer people! Everyone was always smiling and very helpfull! We usually stay at the Ramada...but will never stay anywhere other than the InterContinental Chicago hotel again! - Casey L. Skinner\n", 1, 1], [498, "conrad", "The rooms were beautiful! The staff was friendly and helpful. I love where the Conrad in Chicago was located, it seemed to be close to a lot of places I wanted to visit. Chicago was great, and the Conrad Hotel made my family and my stay that much more exceptional!\n", 1, 1], [1661, "sofitel", "On our first trip to Chicago, my fiance and I stayed 2 nights on our anniversary and were pleasantly surprised by the Hotel and the service we received from the personnel. In the past from other \"luxury hotels\" we have paid much more and received much less. Here the room were very spacious, comfortable and sleek. We spent come time in the hotel bar, LE BAR, and enjoyed a few of their specialty martinis that were second to none! We also enjoyed dinner at the hotel's Cafe des Architectes and received service some of the best service in quite some time. If traveling with a lover we recommend the \"Air of Romance\" package. It was the best! 6 stars!\n", 1, 1], [434, "allegro", "Having come to Chicago with my three sisters for a relaxing weekend of shopping and spa days, the Hotel Allegro Chicago filled every bit of my checklist. We arrived and immediately were checked in and shown to our rooms; we both had the \"double double deluxe\". The rooms were gorgeous, well taken care of, clean, comfortable, well decorated and luxurious. The hotel also has a spa which was perfect because we didn't even have to leave the hotel for our relaxing spa day. The hotel has great staff, they were always attentive to our needs. My favorite part was the complimentary tea and cofee - I am a coffee addict and getting my caffeine fix any time of every day was great! Stay at the Hotel Allegro Chicago if you want great service from a relaxing and luxurious hotel in the heart of Chicago's hustle and bustle!\n", 1, 1], [707, "palmer", "My husband and I stayed at The Palmer House Hilton last month to celebrate our anniversary. What a wonderful hotel!! We had such a great weekend, largely thanks to The Palmer House. Every amenity we could want was right there at the hotel, at our fingertips. And the location is perfect--right in downtown Chicago. We stayed in one of their one bedroom king suites. It was exquisite--so elegant and beautiful. It was easily the most luxurious suite we have ever stayed in. The service was impeccable. Every employee we encountered was both pleasant and eager to accomodate any need we expressed. We had our anniversary dinner at the Lockwood Restaurant in the hotel. It was delicious! We will definitely return to the Palmer House Hilton for our next special weekend getaway. \n", 1, 1], [800, "talbott", "excellent staff and customer service, very clean and spotless. elegant and luxurious with a beautiful ocean view. the bed is very comfortable and relaxing. i give it a five star.\n", 1, 1], [1802, "hyatt", "The Hyatt Regency in Chicago was a wonderful experience for my husband and I as we traveled through the area on vacation. After checking in we simply relaxed in the beautiful atrium for a while before going to our room. To our delight the room was very clean, ultra-modern and furnished with sleek and comfortable furniture. What really impressed us about the room was how spacious it was and the stunning river front views. We were pressed for time to make dinner so decided the Bistro sounded like the best option and it turned out to be a great choice! The food was simply fabulous. After dinner we were able to try out the fitness center, which ended up making our gym at home seem inadequate. This was just what we needed as a restful base for our Chicago vacation and we will definitely stay here again.\n", 1, 1], [1985, "palmer", "My husband and I stayed at the Palmer House Hilton in Chicago for our anniversary. The hotel was beautiful and luxurious as one would expect from a Hilton brand hotel in a major city. The service was excellent with check-in and check-out going smoothly. The location of the hotel was ideal for us as we had plans to attend the theater, visit the Lincoln Park zoo and picnic by the lake. All of these were very close to our hotel. The price was reasonable for the location and luxurious accommodations. We also enjoyed the hotel restaurant and lounge. Highly recommend. \n", 1, 1], [1963, "intercontinental", "Last month, my husband and I stayed at the InterContinental Chicago while we were in town for IMTS. Although they were very busy, the service was excellent and very professional. The staff were always smiling and happy to help. InterContinental was conveniently located near Michigan avenue, and the best stores and restaurants in town. The view from our room was great! Our room was always clean when we arrived home at night, it was decorated nicely, and the beds were extremely comfortable! We ate at the hotel's restaurant Zest, and the food was great! It was by far one of the best hotels we have visited in a while. We will definitely be back!\n", 1, 1], [1713, "ambassador", "How should I start? Well, after staying at the Ambassador East Hotel, i realized it was my favorite hotel ever. The rooms are amazing. The food is great. The Pump room bar is awesome. I love this hotel. If your ever in Chicago, the Ambassador East Hotel is the place to go.\n", 1, 1], [1892, "sheraton", " My wife and I's stay at the Sheraton Chicago Hotel and Towers proved to be the perfect complement to our time spent visiting and exploring the Windy City. Upon our arrival, we were immediately welcomed by the beautiful design of the first-floor lobby and the friendly demeanor of the desk and bell service staff. In seemingly no time at all we were in our clean and well-furnished room with a beautiful and peaceful view of Lake Michigan. In terms of accommodations, I have never personally stayed at a hotel that I could complement more. On our very first night, my wife took advantage of a message therapy session while I swam a few laps in the heated indoor swimming pool. We followed our time apart with a very relaxing time at the Chi bar, which had a very enlivening and laid-back atmosphere. Retiring to our rooms, I couldn't help but remark to my wife about the quality of our room and the bed in particular. I had a very comfortable night's sleep and woke up just on time thanks to a spot-on wake up call from the desk staff. After a quick bite to eat the LB Bistro, we headed out to sight-see. Overall, I can't recommend the Sheraton Chicago Hotel and Towers enough. As far as this customer is concerned, it is the only place to stay if you are in the Chicago area and are looking for accommodations with the best customer service, atmosphere, and amenities. I couldn't recommend it more. \n", 1, 1], [1931, "allegro", " If you are traveling to Chicago and need a place to stay, I highly recommend the Hotel Allegro Chicago. It was visiting time visiting Chicago for the first time on a business trip and a friend referred me to the Hotel Allegro. He said they were pet friendly,which was a huge plus. This is because I hate leaving my kitten muffin with a pet sitter every time I travel for business. Upon my arrival, I was met with friendly valet who treated me like I was the only customer who mattered. I walked in and saw a hotel like no other I have seen before or after. The lobby was decorated with modern furniture and paintings and looked like a place I could relax in. After I had entered and checked in, I saw the staircase, which looked like a testament to the staircase in the \"Titanic\". Frankly, I was amazed and I had not even entered my room yet. My room was a Queen Deluxe room and it was amazing. The bed had a blue headboard,which I have never seen before, and the colors worked together so well I seriously contemplated living there. The room service was exceptional and promptly brought the food I ordered. Later I wanted to get a drink and I enjoyed it at The Bar 312, which is conveniently located adjacent to the hotel. These are the specifics of my stay, but there is much more to be experienced that I did not mention if you visit the Hotel Allegro. In summary, they allow pets, the service is amazing, the decoration superb, and it is conveniently situated next to dining establishments. What more could a person ask for?\n", 1, 1], [1674, "sofitel", "I recently stayed at the Sofitel Chicago Water Tower hotel and I could not be more pleased. The hotel is sleek from the elegant lobby to the modern, stylish rooms. The rooms are something truly special with huge, soft beds with the most luxurious sheets you have ever seen and felt. The bathrooms are beautiful with cool marble tiles and a gorgeous glass and marble shower/tub. If that wasn't enough each room has a crisp 32\" LCD TV that displays TV in the most beautiful and clear way with an absolutely amazing sound system. When you finally make it out of your room, down the grand stair case you need not look further for dinner than the hotel restaurant. It is called Cafe des Architectes and like the hotel itself melds a modern sophistication with classic French techniques. Their wine list is amazing but their prices are fantastic for a hotel near the Magnificent mile. A full dinner including appetizer, main course, and dessert can be had for $45, amazing. If you are looking for a modern, urban, chic hotel in Chicago then look no further, the Sofitel Chicago Water Tower hotel is your only real choice.\n", 1, 1], [1911, "swissotel", "This hotel is one superior hotel. The prices are reasonable and the benefits are just fantastic. My husband and I got a package that lets us get a hotel with a view and the view was amazing. Waking up to seeing Lake Michigan was a site not to miss. The rooms were always cleaned when we got back from our shopping at Bloomingdales or in other places in Chicago, and the customer service was top notch and very friendly.\n", 1, 1], [1616, "hilton", "Our stay at the Hilton Chicago was a pleasure from arrival to departure. The staff was super friendly and helpful, the room was very clean and the location was fantastic. The walking track was an especially nice touch. Highly recommended!\n", 1, 1], [438, "allegro", "My friends and I were in Chicago last month and were looking for a resonably priced hotel in a decent neighborhood. Well we came across the Hotel Allegro and immediately fell in love! Everything from the colors, the staff, the architecture, and the pricing were AMAZING! We couldn't have found a better hotel. The service was impeccable..talk about a 5 star hotel for someone with a 2 star budget! My friends and I plan on staying here next year when we return.. I can't wait until then! \n", 1, 1], [564, "homewood", "This hotel gives you a lot for a reasonable price! It has a great downtown location and a lot of added bonuses. We loved the evening cocktail hour with free alcoholic beverages and appetizers. They also have complimentary breakfast and complimentary dinner. The fitness center was very clean, I didn't want to leave it! Our room was a spacious suite with a kitchen included! And I took advantage of the free grocery delivery. Beds are comfortable and the room looks like it was recently renovated. But the thing that really stood out was the teamwork of such a wonderful staff. We will be back to the Homewood Suites the next time we come to Chicago!\n", 1, 1], [1920, "swissotel", "I stayed at Swissotel Chicago when I was on business and it was very nice. The staff was very helpful and room was very clean. I would stay again in a heart beat!\n", 1, 1], [1914, "swissotel", "My husband and I had a wonderful time at Swissotel Chicago, when my husband went for a trade fair. We got a classic double room for two nights and it was definitely worth the money. Clean and comfortable, chic and new fixtures. The view of the pier was magnificent. Staff were most helpful and prompt when we requested extra towels and pillow. It's right next to riverside restaurants and river is very pretty.\n", 1, 1], [1780, "conrad", "I went to stay at this hotel last year. I have got to say it was a great authentic experience, the dining Restaurant was clean and fantastic the rooms were very comfortable with a friendly staff. Its location couldn't be more perfect so close you can walk to do some shopping. Looking at it from the outside at night is very beautiful. It is very affordable. I recommend this place to anyone and plan on staying again the next time i come to town.\n", 1, 1], [1895, "sheraton", "The Sheraton Chicago Hotel and Towers was everything you could ask for in a hotel. It was meticulously clean, very orderly, but still perfectly warm and comforting. The rooms are very big and spacious, and the beds are so soft, it's like heaven! I didn't test out the room service, but I'm sure it would be just like everything else... perfect!The hotel staff are just so nice. There was a spectacular view from my room, and looking out over the city at night is so magical. There are resturants that are easy to access from the hotel, and I especially recommend Shula's Steak House. Overall, I had a fantastic stay at The Sheraton Hotel, and I would definitely stay there again!\n", 1, 1], [1913, "swissotel", "I stayed at this hotel for a weekend and I thought it was really nice. The bed was extremely comfortable and the room was very clean. The room also had a beautiful view. It had everything you could possibly need. I almost didn't want to leave the room. It was definitly worth the price. I would go back. The clientel was also very helpful. \n", 1, 1], [1881, "sheraton", "My family and I stayed here while we were visiting Chicago. This was a perfect location to many of the things we wanted to do and was easy to get around. It was in a safe neighborhood and was great accomodations. The staff was friendly and went the \"extra mile\" to make sure we had everything we needed. The beds were comfortable. We would definitely stay here again. \n", 1, 1], [1888, "sheraton", "The Sheraton Chicago Hotel and Towers is my favorite place to stay in Chicago! I travel to Chicago very often to visit my son, who is training for the U.S. Navy. They make every stay feel like a luxorius vacation. The indoor pool and sauna are amazing, and I never have to miss a workout because the gym is fully equipped. If you dine at the LB Bistro, you must try the Eggs Benedict :) The staff are friendly and the prices are very reasonable for a hotel of this stature.\n", 1, 1], [465, "ambassador", "My husband and I came to the Ambassador East Hotel for my sister's wedding. The hotel had been very helpful and professional in helping us coordinate a wedding with over 200 guests. When we arrived we were impressed by how organized they were, helping us check and get our guests situated. They were even nice enough to let us leave guest gift bags in each of our guest's rooms. Our rooms were clean and beautifully appointed, with a view of the city. We held the rehearsal dinner/groomsman party in the pump room which has a gorgeous bar complete with celebrity photos on the wall. After my sister was married in a church downtown, we held the reception in the large banquet hall. Again the hotel was great about shuttling all of our guests and helping us arrange dinner, the DJ and all of the wedding's decorations. We had a great time. Ambassador East Hotel is highly recommended!\n", 1, 1], [1613, "hilton", "This hotel is located right in the hustle and bustle of the city of Chicago. It is ideal for the corporate executive. Not only in terms of location but the hotel offers a spectacular view of the ocean. The dining room is spacious and makes eating at this hotel a really pleasant experience. While dining the guest experiences a nice ambiance as they overlook the city, which is picturesque especially at night, when the city lights come on. The rooms are nice and spacious and allows the guest to get all their work done with a desk area. I would strongly recommend this hotel for the corporate executive!\n", 1, 1], [1655, "monaco", "I went to Chicago and We made a reservation to Hotel Monaco Chicago which is a Kimpton Hotel, and I decided to stay in a tranquility suite. Which was amazing I went with my family and all of us had a comfortable space. Room Service Was great served quickly and the cleaners clean quick. Another thing was that it was pet friendly which I thought was cool meaning you could bring your dogs. The hotel was amazing and beutiful.\n", 1, 1], [693, "omni", "The Omni Chicago is hands down, the best hotel in my opinion in the chicago area. I am a neat freak but here you need not worry about cleanliness as they are the best at keeping the rooms tidy. Our check in was easy and fast and the staff at the hotel was very courteous and friendly. I forgot my hair dryer but thankfully, one of the many perks at this hotel, they provide one for you in your room! That's a small benefit compared to the lucious pool and dreamy massages they offer! I have never had a massage like that before! My favortie thing about the Omni is the high speed wireless internet that is available to all guests. I am able to do my work online in all areas of the hotel which saved me a lot of time as I was not at my office but still had a lot of work to get done. I also LOVED the TV they provide in the room. A big plasma with a beautiful, crisp picture! I don't even have that at home! Needless to say, I spent almost all night lounging in the comfortable bed watching movies only to fall asleep and wake up to the newspaper delivered to my hotel door in the morning! I will be coming back to the Omni on my next trip to Chicago. That's a promise. \n", 1, 1], [531, "hardrock", "My husband and I recently stayed at the Hard Rock Hotel Chicago and we can't wait to go back! The hotel is located in downtown Chicago and seems to be at the heart of the city, we were close to everything. The Hard Rock Hotel is forty stories high and the view from our room was simply breathtaking. The room itself was spotless and featured modern luxurious decor and furnishings. The bed was heavenly. The hotel staff was friendly, upbeat and extremely helpful, we asked for directions and restaurant recommendations and they were spot on with both. I highly recommend the Hard Rock Hotel in Chicago and I would stay there again in a heartbeat. \n", 1, 1], [581, "hyatt", "My experience at the Hyatt Regency Chicago was simply amazing. I had a wonderful stay there will my husband. My husband has allergy problems nearly everywhere we go, and we were worried about that so we talked to the desk clerk there. They were able to provide us with a Hyatt allergy-friendly room. We were so relieved and the room was beautiful. The furniture in the room was actually cleaned with pure tea tree oil. It was the most comfortable stay we have ever had. On top of that my husband had to spend some time in the room working on some business, so the high speed internet they provided was very convenient. We took full advantage of the 24 hour room service. I will definitely stay there again. It is a vacation simply staying in your hotel room. \n", 1, 1], [433, "allegro", "For Top Class Treatment Choose Hotel Allegro. In all of my years of buisness travel and vacationing, I have never been more happy with the service at a hotel than I was at Hotel Allegro. I searched many hotel websites looking for the perfect hotel to spend our honeymoon, and Hotel Allegro seemed like the right choice. Soon as I walked into to their elaborate lobby area, it was like I was a big shot on Wallstreet, the service was excellent and the best part, they allow animals. They treated my little dog Johnny like he was royalty. They have everything you could ever need in a hotel, from in room spa service to a workout center. They even made sure that I had all of my drinks and amentites ready for the Monday night Bears game. If I were to give have to rate it from a 1 - 10. Id have to give it a 10 many times over. I highly recommend Hotel Allegro in Chicago Illinois and I will be back again.\n", 1, 1], [1739, "hardrock", "After searching for the perfect hotel for my Chicago getaway I knew once I came across the Hard Rock Hotel, that this was the hotel for me. After seeing the exceptional accommodations the hotel offered, I booked my reservations right away. When I arrived at the hotel I was astonished at how beautiful and big the building and grounds were kept. I was greeted warmly by the front staff and received my room key within a few minutes. I was also given helpful pointers to nearby attractions and restaurants. I took the elevator up to my room, and when I opened the door my jaw dropped as the views of the Chicago skyline was impeccable. After relaxing I went down to the bar for a few cocktails and was impressed by the fast, courteous service I received. After my cocktail hour, I decided to unwind and let me tell you the beds must be sent from heaven. I had one of the best nights of sleep I have had in a long time. I highly recommend the Hard Rock as I have stayed at many around the US and this is definitely on my top 5 list. Hope you all enjoy it as much as I did, and I can't wait to return. Ashley B.\n", 1, 1], [441, "amalfi", "The Amalfi Hotel in Chicago is a wonderful hotel. I had the opportunity to stay there on business and wished I could have stayed for longer. The staff is so nice and helpful. They really treat you like a VIP and are there to help with any questions you might have. The rooms are so beautifully decorated that you wish you could hire their designer to do your home. In my room I had access to my own personal dvd and cd collection. Did I say IN the room? I didn't even have to leave or order something on the television. It was nice to shower with their AVEDA products and get into my microfiber robe and slippers that they supplied me. While staying in for the night I was also able to use my laptop in my room since they have wifi throughout the hotel.The bed was very comfortable and everything was so clean! In the morning I was treated to a great complimentary breakfast and ordered a massage. Yes...ordered. They came to my room and I didn't even have to leave. Very comfy! This hotel was by far the best that I have stayed in and I travel a lot for business so I would know.You always have high expectations when you're staying at hotels and I'm pleased to say that my expectations were far exceeded. I'm recommending this hotel to everyone I know that will be staying in the Chicago area. I will definitely be back and make reservations for a longer stay this time because I just didn't want to leave! I would rate this hotel 5 out of 5 stars.\n", 1, 1], [1673, "sofitel", "The Sofitel Water Tower was a wonderful place to stay for my husband and me for our 20th anniversary weekend trip to Chicago. We got married in the city but then moved away, and it was so romantic to return. We loved how near the Sofitel was to everything - the Magnificent Mile was just outside our door, and we could walk to Navy Pier and other attractions as well. Chicago has changed, but the Sofitel made it feel like home again... except a very plush and elegant version of home! We stayed in a Junior Suite, which had great views of the city, and room service was very attentive when we called for champagne after midnight the day we arrived. Both nights before leaving for supper, we had a cocktail in Le Bar and enjoyed talking about what we'd done during the day, and all the great memories this town has for us. But I have to say we have some new great memories now, thanks to the Sofitel Water Tower!\n", 1, 1], [1954, "amalfi", "I recently stayed at the Amalfi Chicago with my wife on a business trip. We decided to combine business with pleasure and made a long weekend out of our stay after business was concluded. We enjoyed the luxurious in-room spa service and stayed in the superb one bedroom suite with incomparable views of the surrounding city. The individualized attention from check-in to reservations was exceptional and better than what we usually receive from concierge service. The Amalfi actually delivered what they promised and more. Our weekend was more relaxing and enjoyable due to the excellent training of the staff and the amenities offered on site. The hotel's design is modern and sophisticated with the decor being a delight to the senses. Lots of color and clean lines made a great impression and felt both modern and comfortable. Breakfast is served on each floor or in room and my wife especially appreciated the availability of the fresh fruit and yogurt. Being of European descent, I enjoyed the croissants, whole grain muffins, real butter and marmalade. We also brought along our Standard Poodle, Sterling, and the Amalfi is one of the few luxury hotels that allow for pet accommodations and understand that your pet is part of the family. We purchased the pet pamper package and this allowed Sterling to have his days while we had ours and we reunited in the evenings. Sterling slept in our room as usual at the foot of our bed and this contributed to our feeling \"at home\" while away. For pet lovers this is a big plus. Finally, transportation to and from our corporate jet was arranged with ease by the hotel so we did not bring an assistant with us on this trip to handle these arrangements as is normal. This allowed us a bit more privacy and it is scarce for us to be able to do this, another appreciated bonus of our stay. Thank you Amalfi for a superb experience. \n", 1, 1], [523, "hardrock", "The Hard Rock Hotel in Chicago has it all: location, comfort, and rockability! We stayed at the Hard Rock Hotel in Chicago recently and found it to be amazing! The location was perfect as it is walking distance to the Magnificent Mile, Navy Pier, and Lake Michigan. It was just a short ride by bus or cab to the sports stadiums, Shedd Aquarium or the Museum of Science and Industry! The food, although it was pricey, was great! There is a spa on site if you need a little time to relax and recoup after all that rockin', and if you have pets, they get the ROYAL treatment, complete with gifts! I would highly recommend the Hard Rock Hotel of Chicago! \n", 1, 1], [732, "sheraton", " My wife and I's stay at the Sheraton Chicago Hotel and Towers proved to be the perfect complement to our time spent visiting and exploring the Windy City. Upon our arrival, we were immediately welcomed by the beautiful design of the first-floor lobby and the friendly demeanor of the desk and bell service staff. In seemingly no time at all we were in our clean and well-furnished room with a beautiful and peaceful view of Lake Michigan. In terms of accommodations, I have never personally stayed at a hotel that I could complement more. On our very first night, my wife took advantage of a message therapy session while I swam a few laps in the heated indoor swimming pool. We followed our time apart with a very relaxing time at the Chi bar, which had a very enlivening and laid-back atmosphere. Retiring to our rooms, I couldn't help but remark to my wife about the quality of our room and the bed in particular. I had a very comfortable night's sleep and woke up just on time thanks to a spot-on wake up call from the desk staff. After a quick bite to eat the LB Bistro, we headed out to sight-see. Overall, I can't recommend the Sheraton Chicago Hotel and Towers enough. As far as this customer is concerned, it is the only place to stay if you are in the Chicago area and are looking for accommodations with the best customer service, atmosphere, and amenities. I couldn't recommend it more. \n", 1, 1], [520, "fairmont", "The windy city fairmont hotel is one of chicago's best recently renovated to bring it up to modern day luxury. With fine dining atmosphere and hotel deluxe suites and the view that is breath taking. This hotel can accommodate the guest no matter what you desire. with a fabulous restaurant on the 15Th floor with dinning at its best. With it over looking the great Chicago area. So the next time your in the windy city come and stay with us where you will be pamper by our fine staff.\n", 1, 1], [1996, "palmer", "The Palmer House Hilton hotel takes luxury to a whole new level of existence. The rooms are beautifully decorated, with class and superior quality furniture. The hotels restaurant \"lockwood\" consist's of delicious French and Italian cuisine. The location is in the prime area to downtown, and shopping areas. This hotel is suited for pristine guests, and those who are not willing to settle for less. If you're looking for not just any stay, but a stay in luxury, you should give The Palmer House Hilton a try. It is one of the best of the best in Chicago, and your stay will be one to remember.\n", 1, 1], [562, "homewood", "Homewood Suites by Hilton Chicago Downtown is a wonderful hotel. The hotel is very elegant, classy and only offers the best. The hotel offers complimentary breakfast, along with delicious meals and wines in the afternoons. The suites are very real designed and has a very upscale look. This wonderfully cozy yet graceful hotel leaves you with an experience of a lifeltime. I would recommend this awesome hotel to anyone that was looking for beautiful, yet comfortable hotel experience.\n", 1, 1], [1721, "hardrock", "When I planned my summer vacation, I was wanting to travel somewhere new. Chicago was on my mind because of the fast city life. I got in a flight to Chicago and arrived at the Hard Rock Hotel. It was grand and I spent a total of 4 days and nights there. The luxury was exotic and the location was right around the corner from most shopping and dining venues. The room service had me drooling because the food was so delicious, I could hardly picture not feeling satisfied. I met up with a few of my friends and they offered me a tour around town. I enjoyed the stay there and will come back sooner than later. \n", 1, 1], [529, "hardrock", "Set up an important meeting for some clients at the Hard Rock Hotel Chicago. They were flying to Chicago for a special trip to checkout the music scene and to discuss business with my company. Naturally, they wanted to stay here. The client really seemed to like their rooms, but felt the Paul Reed Smith room was too cramped for our day-long meeting (330 sq ft.). In a panic, I contacted the HRH staff and they actually had another, bigger, room available. We quickly moved our meeting in the Birdland room for the rest of the day and the meeting was a rousing success. (Birdland room is 660 sq ft.) We have a new client and so does HRH. This is where the client wants to stay every time they fly in for future business meetings with us.\n", 1, 1], [602, "intercontinental", "At the InterContinental Chicago, you pay for more than a room. You pay for an experience. Let me elaborate. I was a bit reluctant to pay a premium for location and amenities. Like any novice traveller to Chicago, I saw the mass glut of cheap accommodations out in the suburbs, and those were originally what I set my sights on. Price is a powerful signal, and the sheer discount of those options drew me in. But after doing a bit of research, I realised that distance does have its costs. The price of transit in the Chicagoland area isn't free. And it's far from what I'm used to. Car use is price prohibitive. (I knew that originally, which is why I wasn't going to drive.) But the sting of using the automobile (parking, congestion, toll roads, etc.) gets shoved off onto taxi fares and auto rental. So, I ultimately had to end up looking for a place well connected with mass transit. But mass transit has its costs too, which meant that staying at a focal point downtown had its advantages. That's what originally drew me to InterContinental. But InterContinental is much more than the right room at the right place. The decor of the rooms and the amenities available to the guest are unsurpassable. I was travelling on international business, so the ease with which I could transact in foreign currency was a draw. (They had a currency exchange right there on the premises.) And the fact that massages, dry cleaning, and event planning were available in-house was a huge plus. My work gets me tied up in knots. It also leaves little time for doing chores. So the ability to grab a massage while my suits were being finished was a relief for me. But, on top of all that, the event planning was what put InterContinental over the top. Being able to coordinate a comprehensive tour of Chicago while completing my business and managing my personal life was a weight off my shoulders--and something I won't forget. In the end, if you're a newcomer to Chicago staying in a time-crunch, the InterContinental is for you. The pricetag of rooming downtown can seem prohibitive, but when you factor in the convenience and savings in marginal costs, it's nothing in the end. And the InterContinental is not only price-competitive with the other downtown options, it also makes staying downtown the convenience and thrill it should be.\n", 1, 1], [1982, "palmer", "A hotel made for royalty. Decked out to the top with luxuries you could only dream of, it is an amazing experience! It's located right in the middle of everything in Chicago, and pulls in all the best attributes of the city into one fun filled experience. The customer service was fantastic, as they were very responsive and polite to my requests and fixed any complaints without a complaint of their own. A beautiful experience that I would certainly do again!\n", 1, 1], [1648, "monaco", "This is a beautiful hotel with a great view of the Chicago River and a short walk to all the best places to visit in the city! I had an unbelievably pleasant and relaxing stay with an in-room massage and fantastic room service. If you're looking for a vacation in Chicago and want to experience the best the city has to offer as well as live in luxury and comfort, I highly recommend this hotel and I would definitely come again!\n", 1, 1], [1870, "knickerbocker", "First let me say wonderful!! My wife and i were refered this Hotel by a friend. After traveling to Chicago many time we have had many experiences good and bad with different hotels. We were amazed with the Knickerbocker, we felt like royalty from our first step on the property. Everyone was willing to make our stay rememberable. This Hotel made a routine trip to Chicago a dream Vacation. I can not wait to return...\n", 1, 1], [794, "talbott", "The atmosphere at the Talbott Hotel is very welcoming when you first walk in. The employees are friendly and will greet you when you first arrive. The hotel seems to be luxurious, even from the lobby, and right away, I was very excited for my stay! I stayed in a double queen room with my friend. The room is spacious enough, and beds are very comfortable. I didn't try the room service, but they do have a fitness club close by with a spa, which is very convenient. I also love how the room has individual climate controls! Very neat! Also handy that there is an iHome in the room. I'm usually stuck using just a regular alarm clock radio at other hotels. I will most likely stay in this hotel another time. It was a wonderful experience!\n", 1, 1], [1723, "hardrock", "The Hard Rock Hotel in Chicago has it all: location, comfort, and rockability! We stayed at the Hard Rock Hotel in Chicago recently and found it to be amazing! The location was perfect as it is walking distance to the Magnificent Mile, Navy Pier, and Lake Michigan. It was just a short ride by bus or cab to the sports stadiums, Shedd Aquarium or the Museum of Science and Industry! The food, although it was pricey, was great! There is a spa on site if you need a little time to relax and recoup after all that rockin', and if you have pets, they get the ROYAL treatment, complete with gifts! I would highly recommend the Hard Rock Hotel of Chicago! \n", 1, 1], [1809, "hyatt", "Quite simply the Hyatt Regency Chicago is the business traveler's best friend. Recently I had to attend a seminar in Chicago and stayed at the Hyatt. To say I was impressed would be an understatement. Centrally located in the heart of downtown, the Hyatt has perfected the art of ultimate guest satisfaction. On arrival the staff goes into overdrive. They make you feel like you are the only guest in this huge hotel. The rooms are very big and elegantly furnished with 100 percent cotton linens. My room came equipped with flat screen tv, wi-fi and high speed internet. Room service was quite extensive and if it was not on the menu they went out of their way to accomodate you. There were also car rental on site as were restaurants, cocktail bar and a 24 hour dining room. They have state of the art conference rooms with high tech features. There is also catering and limo service. The staff is multilingual and the concierge service is very professional. All in all they will pamper you from head to toe and other parts in between. This hotel is definitely worth the price and I will definitely return not as a business traveler but as a tourist who wants to be pampered. My only regret? That I could not stay much longer. \n", 1, 1], [548, "hilton", "My stay here was superb. The view from my windows was stunning, as I looked out I could see the beautiful Grant Park. The room had a nice airy feel but was also warm and inviting. The bed was very comfortable. The wireless internet was fast and effective which is nice especially when on business trips. THe hotel is in walking distance to the museum which is nice for those on vaca. Overall I thouroughly enjoyed my stay here. \n", 1, 1], [1944, "amalfi", "Amalifa Hotel in Chicago was an extremely pleasant and exciting hotel experience. I was taken away by the design and decor of the building and the exceptional customer service. I will definitely be returning for another stay!\n", 1, 1], [1867, "knickerbocker", "I wouldn't know how to begin to write something negative about the Millenium Knickerbocker Hotel in Chicago. Everything about this hotel is fantastic from the outside of the building to the hotel lobby all the way to the rooms. With very clean and plush rooms, this is the place to stay! When you are not at the hotel eating at the elegant dining area or having a great breakfast first thing in the morning, there is plenty to do around the town. Take a shopping spree down Michigan Ave or head to one of the museums or the pier to look around. Whatever you decide to do, you can't go wrong. This place is wonderful!\n", 1, 1], [1206, "affinia", "As others have said, once all the construction works are completed I suspect that the prices this hotel can (legitimately) charge will put it out of our price range. Which will be a pity because it is an excellent hotel, & the location couldn't be better. The room was very spacious, with separate sitting & study areas & a nice bathroom. Only 3 minor points: downstairs they were serving a free basic breakfast (coffee & pastries), but we only knew of it on our last morning - nobody had mentioned this; the cost of internet - $9.99 - is a bit dear especially when lots of motels now offer it free; there was only powered milk in the rooms, which wasn't that nice. But none of these really spolied a really enjoyable stay. \n", 1, 0], [1264, "ambassador", "My stay at the Ambassador East was great! The hotel is in a great location in the charming Gold Coast neighborhood of downtown Chicago. Gave me the feeling of staying in a Chicago neighborhood vs. the concrete jungle of downtown, but the Magnificent Mile and Rush Street are just a few blocks from the front door. The staff was very friendly. Also, really enjoyed having drinks in the historic Pump Room. They had a live band on Saturday, and I really enjoyed looking at the pictures of the celebrities throughout the lounge that visited from years gone by. Definitely recommend it. \n", 1, 0], [1428, "james", "We have just returned from a week at the James Chicago. The hotel is fabulous, very chic and chilled. The service is beyond compare. Check in and out were swift and painless. The Concierge service is also super efficient having located an excellent hair salon and a couple of fab restaurants for us during our stay. The hotel restaurant itself is rated 5 in the top 10 in Chicago - voted by Chicago residents. We stayed on the 14th floor with great views of the city. The room (a deluxe king) was equipped with a great selection of cocktail making lovelies, hairdryer, safe, tv, robes & slippers, a very interesting selection of minibar items (one of which was a real surprise!) including crisps/snacks a first aid kit and an umbrella! We also had a spotless and elegant bathroom with Kiehls products and a cosy little dining area. The ipod dock/CD/radio and complimentary chillout CD were a nice touch and husband liked the enormous plasma tv. The super comfy bed ensured a good snooze and complimentary WiFi allowed us to plan our next day's activities from our bedroom. We were so busy touring around the city we didn't get an opportunity to use the gym or the spa - both of which looked fab. The bar/lobby area is a haven of civilised tranquility with smooth music playing in the background to help you chillout that bit more. Staff are attentive without being fussy and a good selection of drinks and bar snacks are available. The barman mixes a mean mohito ! This hotel is full of nice little thoughtful touches to make people feel welcomed and cared for e.g. The Virtual Tuck In service - basically a couple of PCs with webcams to allow people to say goodnight to their children when they're away from home on business. Also the dog biscuits and water outside the front door for our furry friends. Next visit to Chicago I'll definitely be staying here and wouldn't even consider an alternative if The James can maintain these standards. \n", 1, 0], [1525, "sheraton", "We recently celebrated our 20th anniversary in Chicago and stayed at the Sheraton Chicago Hotel and Towers. Having looked at a gizillion places I chose this one because of its location to Navy Pier. (We were going on a dinner cruise-The Odyssey at Navy Pier) The hotel is a short walk...unless you are wearing heels:) to Navy Pier. We found out on the way home only a $5 cab ride:) worth $20 to your blisters!! Its also only a short walk to Michigan Ave shopping...for comfortable shoes perhaps?? I chose this hotel because of location, but the views are also terrific. This time we had a lake view of Navy Pier, but our previous trip we had a river and lake view. both very nice. The hotel is very nice. Several restaurants, although we haven't tried them. The burger place downstairs sure smelled good though:) We ended up at Bubba Gumps at Navy Pier. GOOD! The rooms were very spacious and CLEAN!! I am kind of a germaphobe! so clean is important for my sanity:) The bottom level has doors that leads right out to the riverwalk, and a cool water fountain. :) I obviously highly recommend this hotel:) I <3 CHICAGO \n", 1, 0], [1488, "omni", "I'll keep it short. My wife, daughter and I stayed at this hotel for 3 nights. We go on several vacations a year and this was a great hotel. Location: It is located in the center of the Magnificent Mile (Michigan Ave.), so it is near or easily accessible to everything you might want to do. Hotel: The hotel itself is very clean, as were the rooms. Maid service was excellent, including 2x daily cleaning and turndown service (I think they missed a night). Service: Every staff member we encountered was super friendly and kind. They always have someone at the lobby door greeting you with a smile. Every night we had milk and cookies waiting in our room (sometimes chocolates on our pillows). They always pushed the elevator button for you if they were near it. There was no shortage of people to ask things. My only conplaint was that the congierge was tough to get. They shouuld have more than one, or longer hours. Other: We had breakfast in the 676 Restaurant and it was very good, and well attended, appointed. They even carried my wifes plate to the table from the buffet. The pool was a nice addition and a hit with the kids. It was nice to go for a swim after a long day of walking. Pool and changing areas were spotless. Room: Clean, sunny and spacious. Probably over 400 sq. ft. - 2 TVs, couch, desk, chairs - all in perfect shape. The windows open for some fresh air. Pillows were pretty comfortable. With all aspects considered, I think this was an unbeatable value! I would not hesitate to stay again or recommend it to a friend. I truly have nothing negative to say about the hotel. It was a wonderful stay and we will miss being there. Omni has hit the right formula to make a guest feel like a welcomed person as opposed to just a nuisance or a number. The airlines have cornered the market on that. \n", 1, 0], [1384, "hyatt", "Great hotel in a wonderful location. I stayed in this hotel last weekend for one night before coming home and I loved it. I couldn't recommend it highly enough. Evidently popular and busy, the staff were still helpful. The rooms were lovely and spacious and clean. Bathrooms were clean, bright and spacious also. I'd definitely recommend this hotel too, it's close to the magnificant mile. \n", 1, 0], [1540, "sheraton", "The Sheraton is a fantastic hotel. My wife and I stayed on the 29th floor overlooking the Chicago River and Lake Michigan. The view was great. We got a corner room that also had a couch in. The hotel was just a short walk to the Navy Pier and the Magnificant Mile Shopping area. Food at the hotel was great. Service from checking in to maid service was first class. Great Hotel, Great Town, Highly recommend it. \n", 1, 0], [1371, "homewood", "Our third stay at the Homewood Suites Chicago proved to be just as great as the previous two. The staff are consistently friendly, polite and professional - and this applies whether they are working at the front door, servicing the rooms, managing the breakfast room or on the reception desk. They genuinely seem happy to be working here and can't do enough for their guests. The rooms are large and clean and seem to have good insulation from each other (we didn't hear a thing from our neighbours and the hotel was quite busy). The hotel is well placed for walking to the shops on Michigan Ave, or catching a bus or subway. There is a Jewel Osco and a Trader Joes each within a couple of blocks, which are perfect for stocking up on groceries etc. My husband heartily recommends 'Binnies Beverage Depot' for a huge variety of beer. Now all we need is an excuse to return to Chicago next year - then we can make it four years on the run at the Homewood Suites, because we wouldn't stay anywhere else! \n", 1, 0], [1433, "james", "I LOVED this hotel. The room was so chic and trendy, the bed was comfortable, great slippers and robes. I love the Keihl's bath products in the bathroom. We went during my birthday weekend, and they had a card and plate with pastries waiting in the room. We got a great deal on a junior suite from Travelzoo, but when we tried to take another trip to Chicago, the deal was gone. I really recommend the hotel. I LOVED it. The ONLY problem we had was with the David Burke Steakhouse. The service was horrible, they switched our order with the table next to our's and the only compensation was they took off a $7 side dish we ordered (and they were nice enough to NOT charge us for the other side dish we DIDN'T get). DON'T go there. Go to the Lawry's accross the street. But stay at the James. (BTW- its not a 3-star hotel like the website lists- its at least 4-star) \n", 1, 0], [1417, "intercontinental", "Stayed here for two days while attending Lollopalooza music festival. One of the best locations in Chicago, on Michigan Ave near the Tribune and Sun-Times buildings. An easy walk or bus ride to many attractions. The King sized room was very nice, not large, but with a generous bathroom. Service was excellent throughout. Check out the awesome swimming pool, straight out of twenties. \n", 1, 0], [1591, "talbott", "My husband and I stayed here for three nights while visiting Chicago as tourists. What a beautiful hotel! Our room was lovely, the staff was super helpful and the location was convenient. They don't have an in house gym, but each day you can get a day pass to a cushy gym down the street. The restaurant in the hotel has a very yummy breakfast. The concierge helped us to make dinner reservations at the last minute our first night there. We were able to walk down the Magnificent Mile from our hotel, as well as through the Gold Coast and Old Towne neighborhoods. There are tons of great restaurants in the area (including the famous Gibsons and the Signature Room in the Hancock tower) as well as lots of shopping. There is currently a lot of construction going on near the Talbott (they are building condos right behind it), but regardless we had a wonderful stay and would definitely stay there again when visiting Chicago. \n", 1, 0], [1599, "talbott", "This is a great find for downtown Chicago. The price is right and the staff are excellent. As noted, there is construction going on around the hotel, but I didn't notice any issues that disturbed sleeping. I asked for a quiet room on an upper floor, and was gladly given one. The lobby is small, the atmosphere is that of a small boutique hotel. The concierge, Stephanie did a super job in finding us a restaurant and booking us reservations (along with a complimentary appetizer). We had a standard room, and it was spacious, tastefully decorated--everything we needed. The bathroom had a nice whirlpool tub for soaking--and the MP3 compatible radio was a nice perk. Just can't say enough about how nice the staff are--every single person you meet. Would definitely stay here again. \n", 1, 0], [1298, "conrad", "We stayed in the Conrad for 4 nights just before Thanksgiving. We had a corner room overlooking N Michigan Av and the Tribune Building. To say this is a 5 star hotel is to damn this place with faint praise - it is wonderful. The staff were unbelievably helpful. The standard of the room was superb - HD plasma screens, luxury bedlinens, iPod radio, huge bathroom. Location is unbeatable - right in the heart of everything - watched the whole Light Festival parade from the window. Breakfasts were excellent - no help yourself buffet here - with full and attentive table service. Would have no hesitation recommending or staying again in this hotel - 5 out of 5. \n", 1, 0], [1201, "affinia", "I was completely blown away by this hotel. It was magnificent. I got a great deal and I am so happy that I stayed here. Before arriving I was nervous as I had read a few bad reviews about the impact the renovation was having on peoples stay, for example very noisy. However, whilst the renovation was still going on and the gym was not open nor the restaurant, it made no difference to me. My room was huge, bathroom was spacious with excellent water pressure, bed was perfect and the view was amazing. Hotel is so close to the great shops of Magnificent Mile, plus a comfortable walking distance to Hancock tower and Millennium Park. \n", 1, 0], [1456, "knickerbocker", "We really enjoyed our brief stay at the Millennium Knickerbocker! From the front desk personnel and bellmen to the housekeeping staff and bartender, everyone we met was helpful and welcoming. Our 11th-floor room was clean and beautiful, and the view looking north to the Drake Hotel and apartments across the street was nice. The in-room coffee service was appreciated, too. There isn't a lot of room in the bathroom for your toiletries, but I'd still take a room in a beautiful older hotel with character over a spacious-but-cookie-cutter room any day! \n", 1, 0], [1543, "sofitel", "Stayed at the Sofitel Chicago Water Tower for 3 nights in early April 2007. Very convenient location just a block from all of the shopping on the Golden Mile. Good restaurant at the hotel serving a la carte breakfast different from the usual fare and with a nice French twist. Dinner at the restaurant was also good. Prices are reasonable. Room is comfortable, only problem was with a card access door lock that usually required several swipes before opening. Excellent service from the bellmen to the concierge and front desk staff. Would definitely stay here again if visiting Chicago. Concierge recommended a small van tour, which was excellent. However early April is too early to visit Chicago as popular activities such as the boat tour of the architecture of Chicago was not operating yet. \n", 1, 0], [1494, "omni", "Just got back from 2 days up in Chicago shopping with girlfriends. First time I have stayed at the Omni. I did so because I saw a $129.00 rate that included $25.00 of free food on Travelzoo. The three of us (55 year olds) all stayed in one suite with 2 double beds and a VERY comfortable pull out sofa. We had plenty of room. Food in the restaurant was great, service was outstanding from everone we came into contact with, early morning delivery of free coffee, juice and hot chocolate was fabulous and recommendations from the staff on where to eat, time of movies, shopping areas, etc was really helpful. Need I mention the outstanding location? Simply the best! We all decided that the Omni is our new favorite hotel. \n", 1, 0], [1569, "swissotel", "I thought the Swissotel was a great hotel. The rooms were very spacious and clean, especially for downtown Chicago standards. Most importantly, the rooms were quiet. I never heard people in the hallways when I was trying to sleep. The only downside was that the beds were not anything special. Sure, like all hotels in Chicago, this hotel caters to wealthy and/or business clients with ridiculous minibar and parking price. However, if you are aware of that prior to arrival, its not a big deal (ie finding a different place to park the car, bringing our own snacks for the room). It would be nice though if hotels such as the Swissotel had a microfridge in the room for guest use. Staff was very helpful. Bellmen instantly got cabs upon request, and the front desk was efficient and helpful. Overall, if I can get a good rate again, I'll stay at the Swissotel the next time I am in Chicago. \n", 1, 0], [1413, "intercontinental", "I was attending a training conference in Chicago and opted to book my own room thru one of the online discount programs rather than stay at the rather sterile and pedestrian hotel where the conference was being held. I booked 4 nights at the Intercontinental and was pleased with the elegance and convenient location (an easy walk to the conference). From the lobby to the rooms, this hotel lives up to it's storied reputation. (The indoor pool seems to be imported from the set of a Busby Berkeley movie!) And even tho' I was there for a conference, the hotel's location on the Mag Mile and a quick jaunt to restaurants and theaters, made for a very pleasant stay at a very affordable price. \n", 1, 0], [1465, "monaco", "My initial thought of the hotel was, this place is just ok, I didnt look up any reviews as I was staying there with 2 other friends. I was truly impressed from ceiling to floor with the room. Views were good, its just the surrounding buildings unless your towards the front where the river is located. I'm crazy about huge bathrooms and this one is HUGE. I love all the space they have. Flat tv, traditional seating and I admired the fabric-based headboards. Those are very nice! Walking distance to restaurants were convenient. I'm a highly frequent traveler to Chicago almost 20 years now and always stay with relatives. In any event, I'd recommend staying at the Monaco again! \n", 1, 0], [1502, "palmer", "My wife and I spent several nights here on a getaway excursion. I didn't choose it -- Priceline gave it to me for $70. If I'd paid the book rate, $175, I'd have been less pleased. No troubles with checkin. Very small room but bed was clean and comfortable. Starbucks in the lobby was a godsend. I'd read horror stories about the staff but they seemed friendly enough. For $70, it's a steal. For its online face value, not so much. Will definitely return if can get similar price. \n", 1, 0], [1336, "hardrock", "A bunch of us got together and we had a great time in this hotel we asked for limes and they gave us like a punch bowl of them the rooms were so awesome you really have to see it to believe how extradionary this hotel is i love the decorations on every floor and being surrounded by such elegance. Will definitely stay here again \n", 1, 0], [1556, "sofitel", "After some deliberation I booked the Sofitel Water Tower Place for a 3 night stop-over in June. This was my first visit to Chicago and it turned out that we had a really great time. We loved our rooms, which were just the basic type on the lower floors but they were very well appointed. The decor is modern and personally I liked it a lot. The rooms were pleasant and airy and the bed extremely comfortable. The hotel location is just perfect, close to the shops on Michagan Avenue, and the beach at Oak Street. Lovely restaurants close by and nightlife in Rush Street is just steps away. The area although bustling was peaceful and quiet. We could walk to most places and I would not hesitate to stay here again. The hotel staff very helpful, always smiling and ready to help; from the doormen to the helpful lady at Conceriage. I would not hesitate at all to stay at Sofitel Water Tower Place next time I'm in Chicago; in fact I look forward to my next visit. \n", 1, 0], [1542, "sofitel", "Mostly great with a few islands of relatively minor problems. First the good: Outside of the hotel and lobby were decorated like a winter wonderland, as befitted the season. The restaurant service was absolutely flawless ( servers who don't write orders because they are expected to remember them, remember clients clearly from one day to the other, and go above and beyond consistently). Rooms are comfortable: yes the beds are great! The gym is well equipped. Second the slightly off putting: mmmhh...we got the \"I love chocolate package\" which advertized: bfast every day, dinner once, snack once and...a gift. And we have an A-Club favorite guest membership, which also advertized \" a gift\". So, no gift...either for the chocolate package or the favorite guest membership. Upon enquiry, \"the snack was the gift\". Not at all what the package suggested. That said, bfast was sublime and the chocolate dinner outstanding as well. Some problems at checkout though: we got charged for all dining despite having booked the package and it took quite a while for a polite but seemingly less than informed front desk staff to correct the problem. Would absolutely go back, but probably not on a special package. \n", 1, 0], [1522, "sheraton", "When we were stranded in Chicago for two days since our flight home was canceled, our airline put us in touch with hotels.com who found us the room at the Sheraton Towers. After a long and frustrating day that ended up with us still in Chicago, arriving at the Sheraton was a joy. The entire staff was wonderful. The bell staff was great helping us (finally) let go of the heavy bags, Jonathan at check in was very helpful and had us in a room which he upgraded for us in no time. We enjoyed the location and the facilities of this property during our unexpected stay and would highly recommend this location to others. We can't say enough about the staff. If we are in Chicago in the future we will definitely return here! \n", 1, 0], [1228, "allegro", "If you're in Chicago and want to stay in The Loop, The Allegro Hotel is perfect for you. It's centrally located, stylish rooms and attentive staff. I stayed at the hotel for 3 nights and was very pleased with everything. The bed was very comfy and had plenty of fluffy pillows, large flat screen tv, radio with ipod docking station and bathroom was hip and clean. Everyone that I came in contact with was very friendly and helpful. My last day there, I ordered room service and not only was my meal perfect and delivered on time, the kitchen called to see if everything was alright. I have never had that kind of follow up service. I've stayed at the Palomar in DC, another Kimpton hotel and received exceptional service there too. I will definitely see if Kimpton has a hotel at my next destination. \n", 1, 0], [1503, "palmer", "Had to bring my new puppy with me on a business trip and stayed at the Palmer House. The service was wonderful, staff was very friendly towards dog owners, even stopped to tell me how nice my dog was. Easy access to red line from Midway. Valets were prompt at retrieving car (they recommended calling down in advance we did and the car was there waiting). \n", 1, 0], [1380, "homewood", "I love the free breakfast and dinners on weeknights. The hotel is clean and nice rooms The pool needs some updating(but kids don't care) My friend and I took our granddaughters for a grandma grandaughter outing and this hotel was perfect \n", 1, 0], [342, "sofitel", "I stayed at the Sofitel Chicago Water Tower hotel a couple of weeks ago while in Chicago for 3 nights. I must say, I was NOT impressed. This is an example of a hotel that tries too hard with little result except for inflating your bill. To start with, the hotel lobby was totally gaudy. It had sculptures and artwork that seemed meaningless and I guess was supposed to give an air of style. The room was ok I suppose, but certainly not worth the premium price I paid for it. The hotel food was presented like it was some kind of amazing French cuisine, but the food, while arranged nicely, tasted unremarkable and again, was overpriced. My final verdict is avoid this hotel if at all possible. It is simply not worth it.\n", -1, 1], [90, "conrad", "For our anniversary this year, my wife and I stayed at the Conrad. We're from the suburbs, so staying at a nice hotel in the city is a big deal for us. It's expensive, so we expect the best for our money. This was most definitely not the best for our money. It wasn't even a good deal either. The problems began right off the bat. When we got to our room, we were both greeted by a musty smell that seemed to hang throughout the entirety of the room. It was like walking into a dusty attic. When I sat down to watch TV, it turns out it wasn't even connected to cable or anything. I kept changing the channel, but it was nothing but static and white noise. I even looked for another remote. After we left our things, we went out for a night in Chicago, but coming back, the smell seemed to have gotten worse. I finally asked the hotel management to come up to our rooms. They moved us to a different room, but they had no explanation for the smell. For a single stay, that was more trouble than it was worth.\n", -1, 1], [99, "conrad", "I recently had the opportunity to stay at the Conrad Chicago Hotel, located on North Rush Street. As part of the Hilton hotel chain, I was confident that I would have a positive experience. Unfortunately, from the time I walked in the door until the time I checked out, I was plagued with nothing but problems. When I walked into the hotel, I was not greeted by the concierge, which is usually a bad sign. (He was reading a newspaper.) Then, when I announced that I was holding a reservation, they desk clerk was unable to find it. I had a confirmation number which they agreed matched a number in their system, but they could not find the room I had reserved. Finally, they assigned me a room, but it was smaller than I had originally requested and it had a bad odor. I was very disappointed with the room and its decor. The room smelled of stale smoke, even though it was on a non-smoking floor. The bedspread was threadbare and there was no soap in the bathroom. I had to keep checking to make sure I was really at the Conrad Chicago. Surely, this was not the way the Hilton chain operates! There continued to be problem throughout my stay. I asked for a wake-up call and it was 15 minutes late, which had me scurrying around so I could make my business meeting. I ordered breakfast to be brought to my room, and it never showed up -- at all! And the water for my shower never reached anything by lukewarm, so my shower was short and unsatisfying. I decided to check out of the Conrad Chicago a day earlier than originally planned because I was so dissatisfied with the hotel and the way it attempted to resolve the problems and issues. Upon my return home, I wrote a letter to the hotel manager, but never received a reply. Because they refused to acknowledge that I had problems, I will not be staying at the Conrad Chicago again, and will avoid all Hilton Hotels in the future.\n", -1, 1], [256, "knickerbocker", "Superhigh Bill at the Millennium Knickerbocker Hotel Chicago My wife and I decided to take a weekend getaway to celebrate our anniversary. I told my wife that I would take care of everything. I booked the Millennium Knickerbocker because it had a great location, it was reasonably priced for a 4 star hotel and had spa features. The hotel loby seemed nice enough and the staff seemed fine. The problems for us started when we went to our room. I have sinus problems, so I didn't notice the smell in our room, and my wife didn't say anything to me because she wanted to go with the flow and not ruin our weekend. We couldn't find the remote for our television and we didn't call down, we were trying to be good sports. We were both disappointed when we realized that our hotel didn't have a pool or hot tub, swimming and relaxing in a hot tub is one of the reasons we go on vacation. Upon checking out I was hit was 250 dollar fee for smoking in our room. My wife and I don't smoke and there was nothing we could do to get out of the smoking fee. If that wasn't bad enough we were hit with a 50 fee for the missing remote control.\n", -1, 1], [64, "ambassador", "My husband and I recently went to Chicago for my Aunt's funeral. We are not familiar with the area so we asked for recommedations of where to stay for the two nights we would be in town. We were told to stay at the Ambassador East Hotel. I wish we could say that our experience there was a good one, but sadly, it was one of of the more disappointing travel experiences we have had. Upon check in we were quickly shown to our rooms, but when we entered our king suite a very strong, musty smell greeted us on the other side. At first I thought I was just being sensitive, but after about an hour in the room we simply had to request to be moved. The smell was too overwhelming. The front desk said they would be happy to move us, but the only other room available was a suite with two double beds, rather than the king bed suite we originally reserved. While this was not exactly what we wanted, we didn't really have a choice to refuse. After transfering to the new room and getting settled, we discovered that the electrical outlet near the sink in the bathroom did not work. While this did not bother my husband too much, I was very annoyed, as I need the mirror while I use my hair dryer, curling iron, etc. I absolutely did not want to have to switch rooms yet again, so I simply had to make due with doing my hair next to the bed. They also only gave us two towels of any kind in the bathroom, so we had to request washcloths and small hand towels, BOTH DAYS we were there! Each time the housekeeping staff seemed incredibly annoyed at these requests. For what we paid to stay at this hotel, we were not impressed at all. The customer service was lackluster and the rooms were not up to par. If you are ever in Chicago, do yourself a favor and stay somewhere else.\n", -1, 1], [233, "james", "I was consistently disappointed throughout my stay at the James. I had heard from others that it was \"agreeable\" and \"workable\" and \"all right,\" or even \"a nice place.\" I figured that there would be no problems and booked a guestroom for a long weekend visit with my long-distance girlfriend. According to the website, I was about to immerse myself and my date in a bath of cutting-edge contemporary furnishings and \"warm tones.\" Well, when I arrived, I felt like I was in an Ikea showroom just before closing time on a busy day. Everything in the front was just a bit too askew. The staff were busy, distracted, inattentive, and in every way keen to show me I was a bother to them. I handled my own bags far too much to be convinced of their commitment to my comfort. I also thought my room was quite pathetic for its price. It looked distinctly like someone had rolled around on the beds just before I got there. The bathroom fixtures felt a little bit gross and smelled very strongly, inexplicably, of men's cologne. Nobody cared when I complained of this and suggested that maybe it was just \"stuck in my nose\" and that it would go away. Well, it didn't, and I had a horrible headache by the time my lady arrived. This ruined my entire first evening in Chicago. For my price I could have stayed a week at an economy hotel, gotten my personal items treated for bedbugs, and still saved money. And I would not have been treated like such a pest. Needless to say, I will be looking elsewhere when I go back to Chicago. I may not be a frequent patron of luxury hotels, but I know when I am wasting my money.\n", -1, 1], [122, "hardrock", "The name \"Hard Rock\" might trigger images of hip rockers but you will be sorely disappointed by staying here. The website alludes to musicians and parties but if you're looking to hob nob with the rich and famous the Hard Rock falls short. The hotel puts on a kitchy show by the decorations in the lobby and around the property but there is nothing exciting about this. The service is mediocre and the rooms aren't clean. I stayed at this hotel last year for a long weekend in Chicago and was very much looking forward to some fun, exciting romance. I should have picked somewhere else. Save your money.\n", -1, 1], [353, "sofitel", "Our stay at the Sofitel was definitely below our expectations. The staff was less than nice to me after I waited several minutes until I was noticed. At first, my reservation could not be found, so I was provided a spare room. The hotel was fairly neat. However, once we got to the room, and onto the bed, we found the bed to be noisy. Just sitting on it made a squeaking noise that was unpleasant. We immediately called down to the front desk and informed them of our concern. We were told to go back downstairs to settle things out. Once we got downstairs, we were provided with another room number. However, we had to wait half an hour for another room to be cleaned and prepared. For such a well reviewed hotel, I was highly disappointed with the amount of time I had to spend to get settled into a room.\n", -1, 1], [376, "swissotel", "Grant it, this hotel seems very nice, but I was not at all pleased with my stay here. The customer service was horrible. I had to request more towels and washcloths several times before receiving them and my linen had not been replaced either. For as much as I paid to stay here, you'd think the least you'd get is an iron. Not! I had to request an iron, too! In addition to all of the failed amenities, I was mistakenly charged twice for my stay and wasn't reimbursed until an entire week later. The next time I choose to visit Chicago, Swissotel will be the last place I think to stay.\n", -1, 1], [199, "hyatt", "I recently stayed at the Hyatt Regency in Chicago, IL, and boy was I surprised. The hotel looks nice from the outside but the smell from the river is noxious. In fact, the smell was so bad one night that it almost made it difficult to sleep or even think of eating. As if this were not enough, the bathroom of my room looked like it hadn't been cleaned in a month and their were stains on the \"fresh\" towels. Towards the end of my stay I saw a mouse on the ground floor and could only imagine what other critters may be lurking in the walls.\n", -1, 1], [259, "knickerbocker", "Although the Millennium Knickerbocker Hotel Chicago claims to be an affordable upscale hotel in the heart of Chicago, it is somewhat expensive, starting at $200 per night. There are very few special discount rates available for the budget conscious traveler. The rooms are modern looking and a little less cozy than one might prefer. The carpeting in the rooms is a little outdated and somewhat dirty in a few areas. The views from the rooms are not as great as they could be. The hotel seems to be understaffed and the heating unit in the room is hard to adjust to the right temperature. Although the hotel is located on Chicago's famous Michigan Avenue, it is a $40 taxi ride from O'Hare airport and a $36 taxi ride from Midway airport, both rather pricey options. If you chose to drive there, the valet parking charge is a hefty $53. Again, not very budget friendly. All in all, even though the Millennium Knickerbocker Hotel Chicago is close to some of the major Chicago attractions, it is only an average hotel on many levels.\n", -1, 1], [362, "swissotel", "While staying at the Swissotel Chicago I experienced some of the worst customer service I have at any hotel. The front desk was extremely rude while checking out, and even seemed to try to hurry us out. The fitness center was always packed and I was never able to get on any of the machines, as was the pool area. While eating at the restaurant, I felt it was a very overpriced meal, but it was very elegant looking. The last issue I had with the hotel was the valet parking, it took them awhile to get my car, and they actually pulled the wrong car around. It was another 10 minutes while I waited for them to sort the issue out. The worst part by far was the customer service, and although the hotel looked nice, it wasn't worth the stay with the way I felt I was treated based on the money I was spending. Next time we are in Chicago, we will be staying somewhere else!\n", -1, 1], [152, "hilton", "I stayed two nights at the Hilton Chicago. That was the last time I will be staying there. When I arrived, I could not believe that the hotel did not offer free parking. They wanted at least $10. What am I paying for when I stay there for the night? The website also touted the clean linens. The room was clean and I believe the linens were clean. The problem was with all of the down pillows etc. Don't they know that people have allergies? I also later found out that this hotel allows pets. I think that this was another part of my symptoms. If you like a clean hotel without having allergy attacks I suggest you opt for somewhere else to stay. I did not like how they nickel and dimed me in the end for parking. Beware hidden costs. I will try somewhere else in the future. Not worth the money or the sneezing all night.\n", -1, 1], [387, "talbott", "For a hotel that touts its luxury location in Chicago the Talbot is very poor (think Motel 6 at a Hilton price). Carpet is threadbare and the walls are paper thin. They are so worried about the mini-bar they constantly do these random room checks, so privacy and sleeping in are unheard of. For the prices they charge ($350.average price for two people). It seems like the money spent on remodeling the exquisite lobby, which was happening while I stayed, could have been better spent on better insulation and more up-to-date furnishings for the guest rooms. But I guess the Talbot is more concerned with first impressions than they are returning guests, which I won't be.\n", -1, 1], [10, "affinia", "I was extremly unhappy with my recent stay at Affinia Chicago! When I arrived to check in, my reservation that I had made, (and confirmed), 2 weeks earlier, was not in the computer.I had to wait 40 minutes in the lobby while a room was being cleaned for me. The whole time the desk clerk gave me dirty looks and texted non-stop on her cell phone, while the office phone rang off the hook. I had no toilet paper in my restroom or trash can in room.I'll never go back,dont waste your money.\n", -1, 1], [82, "conrad", "The name Conrad (the most luxurious of all Hilton hotels) should illicit nothing but images of pure elegance and luxury; however, the Conrad in Chicago, IL did obviously not receive the memo. Upon entering the hotel, we were not greeted by any of the hotel staff. Additionally, we were not offered any help. The desk receptionist was beyond rude. Her snide remarks towards my wife and me set the tone for a the rest of our stay. After getting our card, we were finally offered help with our luggage. The young man who helped us could barely handle our luggage. Strangely, he somehow found more strength when it was time to collect his tip. He received the tip he deserved, which he scoffed about and groaned under his breath as he walked away. Upon first looking at the room it was beautiful. However, closer inspection revealed that the room had NOT been cleaned since the last visitor had left. There was hair in the sink and around the toilet. There was even a used bar of soap in the bathtub. This fact was not met with any apology by hotel staff. Instead, I was told that was preposterous and that the room had indeed been cleaned to the highest of standards. Two-hours later, someone came into the room to \"investigate\". When they saw the mess that had been left, they offered a menial apology. Still another two hours later, housekeeping arrived. The level of incompetence even extended to the valets in the parking garage. In the most incredible display of stupidity of our visit, the valet actually brought the wrong car to me. I was half tempted to take the car that was brought to me (it was certainly an incredible make and model), but my better judgment prevailed. I informed the valet of his mistake, to which he replied, \"Sorry dude, I read your ticket wrong.\" I know that he did not smoke in my car, but he smelled so strongly of smoke, that the smell melted into my seat. Luckily, its location on Rush will help get out of the terror that is Conrad Chicago. There are so many better hotels in Chicago -- please spend your money elsewhere.\n", -1, 1], [365, "swissotel", "I stayed at the Swissotel Chicago while I was on holiday recently and I have to say, that you definitely get what you pay for! I was initially attracted by their inexpensive prices for the luxury that they promised. I was sorely mistaken. The first problem I had was when I got there they told me that they had double booked the suite I had reserved. They gave me a discount but had to downgrade me to a regular room. I should have left then but I decided to keep an open mind. After we were all settled in my husband and I went to The Palm restaurant. My husband has food allergies and they got his order wrong so we had to send it back three times. Each time we asked them to fix it, they stormed off angrily and would return in a huff. After dinner, we went back to our room. Just sitting on the bed I knew it would be a long night. The mattress was hard and the blankets had a bad smell to them. When I went to the restroom, the toilet had not been cleaned from the previous patrons! My husband grabbed a blanket out of the car and we used it instead of the smelly one. We just didn't want to bother the desk staff after the cold reception when we had walked in. I tried their massage service the next day and the massage therapist was very unprofessional. He pressed really had and hurt my back. Perhaps it was because he was distracted with all the texting he was doing off and on throughout the session! For lunch we tried Geneva restaurant in the hotel and the food was not cooked all the way. I decided to eat it anyway and got food poisoning about an hour later! Once I got sick, I was done. I went to the desk and demanded a refund for the next two nights because I was not going to sleep there one more night. I made a formal complaint with the manager who seemed to act like it was our fault and that we were being unreasonable. After a lot of arguing, he finally refunded us and we went to a different hotel. This was the worst place I had ever stayed! I think a Super 8 Motel would have been more luxurious!\n", -1, 1], [154, "hilton", "I stayed at the Hilton Chicago back in July. For a \"luxury\" hotel this place did not meet my expectations. For starters, we arrived fifteen minutes early for check in and were told that our room wouldn't be ready for at least another hour! I'm used to hotel rooms being ready well before check-in timee. Since we had to wait we decided to grab a drink at one of the hotel's restaurants, Kitty O'Sheas. Well, we must have used up almost that whole hour just waiting for drinks. Once we finally got to our room it was OK, although not great for the price. We had no view of anything to speak of even though we had paid for a view, and there were not extra towels as I had requested. We had to call room service twice to receive them, then another two times because our air conditioner wasn't working. Fees for internet were ridiculous and the phone service was terrible so I could barely use internet on my phone. Next time I'm in the Chicago area I won't be staying at the Hilton. I'd only recommend this hotel to people who want to waste money.\n", -1, 1], [260, "knickerbocker", "We stayed in the Millennium Knickerbocker Hotel Chicago in a standard guest room. The rooms had just been renovated, but the changes did not make much of a difference. The room was so small, it felt like we were sleeping below deck on a boat. The decor was drab and there was nothing special about the room. We were excited about the bathrobe and slippers that came with the room, but we assumed there would be a bathrobe and a pair of slippers for each of us; there was only one bathrobe and one pair of slippers. We called the front desk to ask for a second set and were treated like we were trying to scam the hotel and refused to send them. It would not have mattered if they sent a second set; the bathrobe was so scratchy it gave me a rash and there were stains on the slippers. As hotel guests, we expected to be treated with respect and enjoy the stay we paid for. We were severely disappointed.\n", -1, 1], [236, "james", "We stayed at this hotel for our last vacation to the windy city. Although the hotel looks nice, the service is terrible. The staff was rude and unprofessional and not helpful at all. The room service closes at 8pm so don't plan on getting hungry after that time. Also, even though we stayed for a whole week we had to ask for new towels and extra toiletries. I will never go back to that place\n", -1, 1], [73, "ambassador", "My wife and I stayed at the Abassador East Hotel in August to attend the Air and Water Show in Chicago. I called ahead to ensure a SW view that would allow us to watch the airshow from our room if the weather did not permit us to watch from one of the nearby beaches. Upon arrival at the hotel, not only was our room on the west side of the hotel it wasn't even a single king as was requested. Apparently the hotel had overbooked king rooms for the event weekend and we were downgraded to a queen room. The room itself was small and underwhelming. The was not dirty, but the linens and furnishings all had a very old and worn feel. The hotel was packed the weekend we visited. The staff was obviously not prepared to cater to such a large crowd. The concierge and reception desks were continuously busy. The hotel restaurant was very slow and had long waits. The main lobby and other common areas throughout the hotel were also undergoing renovations making getting around and fighting crowds of other people even more difficult! Luckly the weather was nice and the airshow was enjoyable. We will not be staying at the Abassador on future trips. Hopefully, current renovations will provide a much needed lift to the hotels current worn down vibe...\n", -1, 1], [49, "amalfi", "Don't let the website fool you. I stayed at the Amalfi Hotel Chicago on my last business trip, and this was probably one of the worst 4 star hotel I've ever stayed at. The website makes the place look like a 4 star hotel but it's more on par with a 2 stars or 3, if you want to be generous. First off, the rooms are not as nice or clean as they look in the picture. The room that I checked into was dingy with paint peeling from the walls, and the carpet looked like it hadn't been vacuumed since god knows when. Since I was only staying one night, I decided not to ask for a different room- although I don't know if asking for a different room would've made any difference considering the lack of hospitality from the reception desk. When I arrived, there were two receptionists chatting it up- no acknowledgement, no prompt service. I had to wait about 3 minutes although I was the only one in line before any of them acknowledged me. And no, they weren't talking about hotel matters. I'm not a difficult or an especially picky person, and who doesn't chat during work with their co-workers but for them to completely ignore and make a client wait for 3 minutes shows serious lack of professionalism. Do yourself a favor, and go stay at the Marriott if you want service- unless the price is tempting but you get what you pay for.\n", -1, 1], [200, "hyatt", "I recently stayed at the Hyatt Regency Chicago Hotel, in downtown Chicago. During my three days there I experienced the worst service of my life! We made reservations before-hand and upon arrival our room was already booked. It took us nearly two hours to actually get into our room (After being given the wrong key!). When we entered the room, the sheets were stained with what seemed to be cherry kool-aid. I am going to assume that it wasn't. After a night on the town we were bummed for money by three homeless men outside the hotel. After arriving in our room and hoping for a nice hot shower, we found a note on our door with a \"sorry\" note explaining they didn't have any hot water. Early the next morning we were awoken by housekeeping (we had a DND sign on our door). So we decided to wake up and go out for breakfast. Comes to find out our car was broken into in their parking garage. We filed a police report and the police asked the managers for a video of the surveillance. Unfortunately for us their surveillance was out of memory to record anymore. Needless to say we left early the next day and I will never return to such a dreadful hotel ever again.\n", -1, 1], [225, "james", "James Chicago would be one of the worst hotels I have ever been to in my life! Even though i noticed that the design of the place was extremely artistic, its service quality and hotel conditions were horrible. They gave me a room in which the blankets were dirty and looked as if it been used just moments ago! I figured it was because the hotel was busy but I started to notice that the furniture came with a cost in service. The television was not working at all. I was extremely disapointed, especially when coming from a rigorous day of work and just wanting to relax. Sadly, i settled in doing my work instead of frittering my time doing noting when i got the next disapointment. The Wifi was a bust. Absolutely nothing to do but to stare at the furniture or just stare at the wall. I am never going to James Hotel ever again!\n", -1, 1], [274, "monaco", "My Family and I went to this hotel on holiday last month. It was a very bad hotel. When we got there we imediatly checked in and went up to our room. The view from the window was a brick wall. Really? We even asked the Lasy at the front desk, but she said they couldn't put us in a room with a view cause we didn't book one and we couldn't upgrade. Also, My Wife is a light sleeper and the trains kept her up at night. Another thing is alot of ads boast a hot tub in all the rooms but this is not true, our room only had a normal tub. But, the tub had no stopper, so we could only take showers. The room was also very small compared to other hotels with around the same prices.\n", -1, 1], [354, "sofitel", "I wish to express my dissatisfaction with my stay at the Sofitel Chicago Water Tower. My husband and I had planned a trip to Chicago for our tenth wedding anniversary. We had gone to great expense to fly his parents in from California so they could have time with their grandchildren. My husband and I had not gone on a honeymoon because he we got deployed to Iraq the week after we got married. Everyone was so excited! Mark and I had reservations for one of the junior suites. We hadn't gone to Chicago before to be tourists and were looking forward to the view which was offered. Unfortunately, when we got to our room, the view was disappointing. We had requested a non-smoking room and were assigned to one, but it was obvious to us that someone had smoked in there. I am asthmatic and became very ill. We asked to be moved to another room, but were told there were no other rooms (even downgrades) available. Nothing was done to try to make up for this. Because of my health, my husband and I checked out within hours of arriving for our romantic anniversary weekend. This is not how I had imagined spending such a special time. Now, when I think of my 10th anniversary, I will always have this memory to tarnish it.\n", -1, 1], [339, "sheraton", "I was sorely disappointed with the Sheraton Chicago. From the outside it looks like a great hotel, and I guess the inside was clean enough but the decor was really boring and frumpy, not what I expected when looked at the website. The front desk staff was nice enough at first, but when I asked for the wifi password they told me I had to pay extra. I mean come on, I'm paying over 200 bucks a night and wifi is EXTRA? The lady who checked us in got a little snippy about it and said it says so when you make the reservation. (Note to self, don't let your husband book a hotel without checking first about what amenities are offeredd.) So things started off on the wrong foot anyhow. I guess the positives for this hotel are the location and the lakeview (from some of the rooms) and it seems pretty safe. Other than that I was not impressed for the price - I've stayed in big city hotels for half the price that had better linens, a better restaurant, where they got your room cleaned up at a reasonable hour (we stayed two nights and we didn't get our beds made and fresh towels until almost 5). I guess the most unpleasant thing was the odd smell - not musty per se but maybe like chemicals they use to cover up a mildewy smell. In general it seems lke it's on the decline and the staff knows it, they're just kind of lackadaisical. I wouldn't stay there again.\n", -1, 1], [41, "amalfi", "My recent stay at the Amalfi Hotel in Chicago couldn't have gone worse. Apart from the price of staying there and the slow response time of hotel staff I was totally let down by the food that could be found there. There are many attractions in the area and indeed leaving the hotel is the best part of the experience.\n", -1, 1], [998, "hyatt", "Staying here currently. Had aspired to sleep. The paper thin walls allow even the slightest peep from your neighbor to feel like you're right in bed with them. Couldn't sleep anyway because of the cheap, giant fluffy pillows. Called housekeeping, asked for any help...was simply and accomodatingly told, after my plea for help, could they, would they have any ability to supply me with a reasonable pillow? Complete answer before hanging up: \"We do not.\" Hyatt, may your well executed service lead to your demise. Happy\n", -1, 0], [990, "hyatt", "THE ROOM I booked a room here and was told I'd be getting a king bed. When I check in, they say they only have a queen bed room available. I protested to no avail. When I got to the room, it was really only a full size bed. So I went from from a king bed at home to a full size bed in a tiny broom closet of a room in Chicago. For the pleasure, I paid the same price as a normal king bed room. The full size bed we had was also extremely uncomfortable. I think it was lop sided because they never rotate the mattresses. We would wake up with body aches and headaches. My wife even said she lost feeling in her arms some nights. Not good. Also, the internet in the room is hard to set-up, slow to use, and inconsistent. I generally had to restart my computer at least once to get the internet to work. The internet worked one day on my iPhone and then would not log me in. It's not really worth it. ROOM SERVICE Room service was very inconsistent and nonsensical. Some mornings they would take our towels (even the ones we hung up to use again) and not replace them, other times they would replace some towels and not others. They would also come at vastly different times. HOTEL SERVICE This hotel LOVES to nickel and dime. I asked for a fridge in the room and they told me it'd be $25. No other hotel I've ever stayed in (regardless of how many stars it had) has ever charged me for a fridge in the room. Late checkout? charge. Shuttle from the airport? - nonexistent. The front deck \"gold passport\" people can't even figure out how to get you points. In the end I will have to call corporate and get my points for my stay (not that i plan on staying at a Hyatt property again). By the way, apparently the hotel is still undergoing changes because my mini-bar was missing. I was thinking of using it as a fridge instead of paying $25. THE HOTEL The hotel has some cool bars and a beautiful lobby area in the east tower. The west tower has some underground amenities no one uses. The bars are extremely expensive, but the drinks are tasty. The food is edible too, but I wouldn't brag about it. The hotel is not directly on the main street (Michigan), but it's not too far from it. It's right next to the boat tours and, in some rooms, has a view of the Navy Pier. Our room faced another hotel, but we could see a sliver of the pier. The hotel is walking distance from Millennium Park. It's a bit of a walk to any of the L stations though. If you want a wonderful breakfast place, go to Wildberry on Randolph st. It'll have you waiting to eat for a long time, but it's yummy! CONCLUSION I get better rooms, better beds, better service, and better amenities at a Holiday Inn Express or a Best Western. Save the money and stay elsewhere.\n", -1, 0], [999, "hyatt", "This hotel is very busy and is operating way beyond their means. Incompetent service. Hotel ran out of hot water by 9am saturday. Elevators were very slow, waited 10 minutes on any given event. Red line trains ran every 10 minutes beneath city streets and you can hear the thunder in your room from them but it shouldnt keep you awake at night. Used my stay toward NW airlines bonus points. Bar was ok. One cup coffee service was awful. No free wireless and no free cable channels. Fridge was 25 bucks a day to use. With http://hotels.com res got it for 65 bucks with tax so what can you expect.?.... Location was superb and cab service was convenient but not enough to outweigh the negatives.\n", -1, 0], [832, "allegro", "As I sit here in my 14th floor room at the hotel Allegro, I listen to the conversation between husband and wife in the room on my left. She seems to have a cough today. In the room on my right, someone seems to use the restroom quite a bit. I hear the water running and the toilet flushing. I also hear footsteps in the room upstairs. Even roadside motels have better insulation between the rooms. I've stayed in about a dozen Kimpton hotels and this is by far the worst. The room is dirty - the carpet covered in spots and stains, the curtains with a large brown stain (I don't want to guess what it is), paint peeling, rips in the wallpaper. The decor is a bit garish, with Pepto-Bismol covered walls, green and yellow pillows and the filthy brown and white carpet. The size of the room is fine and the bed comfortable, but I'm so glad I had earplugs to avoid listening to others' toilets flushing all night. The location is good for downtown theaters or business. Only three elevators serve this 17+ storey building and they run very slowly. Chicago has many nice hotel options -- many I've enjoyed quite a bit. Unfortunately this is not one of them, and even more unfortunate for me: I'm stuck here for two more nights. I was looking forward to staying here because most Kimptons are hip, comfortable and attractive. This is not.\n", -1, 0], [1014, "intercontinental", "Overall the hotel is very nice. The rooms are spacious and well-appointed, but they tend to be aging or dated. My bathroom was particularly below average, with old wallpaper and a dingy tub with a crummy showerhead. The toilet paper roll holder was pulling out of the wall and its screws were exposed. The conceirge recommended an expensive and mediocre restaurant. I hate it when they do that- it makes me suspect they're getting kickbacks from places that otherwise don't get enough business on their own. Breakfast was very good. It's a relatively large european-style spread.\n", -1, 0], [829, "allegro", "where do I start. The GM was a nice guy for handling the incident I had. Anthony -the Concierge - set me up with a massage when the reservation at the spa i requested was unavailable. Anthony said he knew this spa and it was nice. He set me up and quoted me a price of $125, When i got to the spa (which was actually a seedy nail and hair salon) i saw on the front window that a massage for an hour was $100 with 20% off. At the end of the massage I gave the lady $100 and said thanks you can keep the change, She insisted that I got \"A Hotel Rate\" because Anthony set me up. She called Anthony and confirmed the rate then told me she had to go and pay Anthony the difference - $45. She then offered me a ride to the hotel since she was going there which I declined. In short - shady dealings with this place. I was quite taken back. The GM Selman comp'd me a night but , I felt swindled big time. Stay somewhere else. The concierge has something going on...\n", -1, 0], [929, "hardrock", "I chose this hotel for a nice weekend getaway and was nothing but disappointed. The previous weekend, I stayed at a 2.5 star hotel a few blocks away, and was much more impressed there. The Hard Rock had a number of issues including: very dark room - not much light (artificial or natural); lots of street noise; very cheap decor and furniture; broken cabinet door; very warm room - said they would send maintenance, but they never arrived; had bar charges on account that were not ours. Overall, I was very surprised that this was a 4 star hotel. I expected a much better experience!\n", -1, 0], [1106, "palmer", "I stayed at Palmer House for one night in early January this year. During the check in, the front desk lady asked me to show my confirmation letter of my reservation. I did not bring the confirmation with me because I had not been asked to present it in other places during check in.So she asked to print out one copy in their business center and bring the confirmation to the bell station to get the room key. I did what she told me and went to the bell station. However, people at the bell station was totally confused and none of them have the key. A bellman was nice enough to help me go ask their staff at the front desk. I finally got checked in after waiting at the lobby for about 15 minutes. As other people pointed out before, the room I got was small and old with a twin bed, and I could hear people next door using the bathroom. This was not a pleasant experience, even though I paid over 100 dollars to the hotel.\n", -1, 0], [824, "allegro", "This is about the fourth time we stayed at the Allegro. The previous times, I have nothing but good to say about the Allegro. But my reaction has soured on this place. We have stayed here the past few years on the first weekend in December as a kick off to the holiday season and our shopping. From the very start, this year was a disappointment. I had checked the deals on a number of sites before calling the Allegro. I was quoted one price (higher than what was on line), when I mentioned this, I was told I could have the lower price. At check in, the desk was nice but not friendly. We discovered that our room was not as good as in the past (punishment for asking for a lower price?) The closet had no hangers, we had no place to put our suitcase. No one mentioned the wine reception in the evening. On the second day, we discovered that even our bath mat for the shower was missing. It took two phone calls and almost two hours to get a new one. I wrote the management following our stay. I have yet to receive a reply. Needless to say we will be looking elsewhere when we go into the city the next time. I would advise others to do the same.\n", -1, 0], [1196, "talbott", "I have stayed in the Talbott a few times and had always liked it. This time was my first visit in 2 years and I was disappointed. The hallways are now looking tired and the carpets need to be replaced. I had asked for a corner room but instead was given a small and very dark room looking out onto a wall 10 feet away with multiple noisy vents immediately outside the window. The lights had to be kept on throughout the day even through the days were bright. The bathroom was tiny and would be difficult to manage with 2 people in the room. The AC unit rumbled on permanently with background white noise even when switched off. Having stayed there before I know there are better rooms but this one was the same price as the others I have been in and the risk is getting it again. Other small things contributed - the lobby brownies are no longer, there were no cup lids for the lobby coffee (so you couldn't walk out with the coffee) and I got a newspaper only on the last morning of a 5-night stay. The construction noise was not too bad but does start at 7.30am and goes on until around 8pm, including weekends.\n", -1, 0], [980, "homewood", "We went to Chicago for my 2nd wedding anniversary and stayed at Homewood. My first impression was great, very helpful valet employees and VERY nice. That is one perk of my stay here. Otherwise, we had no problems checking in other than the hotel has 19 floors and when we booked the room we asked that we have the highest room avalible due to the fact that it was my husband first time there and the higher up, the more beautiful the view is. So we got the 9th floor. Not what I call \"high up\" when the rooms started on floor 6. Then the following morning, we went to breakfast of which was ok, nothing great. My husband and I went down in jeans and a sweatshirt but had not really thought about shoes as we thought it would just be a few bagles, some fruit, and that was it. So, we got our food and sat down. After getting stared at for the first 15-20 minutes, an employee came and told us that we wernt allowed to eat breakfast without our shoes on. Remind you, it was about 15-20 minutes after we had even entered the room. So she asked that we go get shoes while sitting down and eating our breakfast. Pretty pointless AFTER we already had gotten our food. I am sure it is because very few employees could speak understandable english that it took so long. Last but not least, dont come with a clean car. I had washed my car one day prior to arriving there and when it was returned, it was filthy dirty.\n", -1, 0], [928, "hardrock", "Our check-in was great, but then we got into our room. The carpet was drenched and stained near the bathroom because the shower (open concept) leaks water onto the floor since there are no doors on it. The mini bar was broken and put an extremely foul scent into the room. Our final hotel bill reflected 2 charges that were incorrect....1 for the mini bar which we did not utilize, and the second was an up charge for a bottle of wine ($69 instead of $50). When my husband went to the front desk to have it corrected, he was met with a very unfriendly and unapologetic employee. It was adjusted, but not without confrontation. There was another guest checking out when my husband was at the front desk who had the same \"mysterious\" mini bar charge on her bill as well, and was trying to have it corrected. Overall, the location of the Hard Rock was nice but it will be the last time that we stay in one,\n", -1, 0], [1065, "monaco", "We got a spanking deal at this hotel for $99 a night. It's in a good location to the Loop. Excellent transportation options abound. My gripe comes from the fact that we were obviously put in a \"crappy\" room. It overlooked the back of the building and the roof of a building next to us. The toilet in the room was not bolted to the floor. Other than that, if I needed to stay in the Loop again for something and I knew I wasn't going to be put in a undesirable room, I would stay here again.\n", -1, 0], [1119, "palmer", "Beautiful historic hotel -- and since I'm in historic building business, was looking forward to stay. Moved rooms on second night because of loud party in adjacent suite, they escorted me to a room that was completely torn up -- duct work torn apart in bathroom, lamp fixtures literally falling off wall, mirror torn off wall, etc. Ended up in a room on 20th floor -- much nicer, but yesterday waited 10 minutes for elevator on two separate occasions. Only two of three elevators to top floors work -- and these two elevators skip floors, so you can be stuck waiting for ever. When I raised this to hotel staff, was told this was an old hotel and basically to stuff it. Umm, no. This is not an old building problem, this is a fixable elevator problem if anyone cared enough to fix it. Thumbs way down, stay away. Go to the Drake or Knickerbocker if you're looking for old world charm, sans hassle.\n", -1, 0], [844, "amalfi", "The room itself was fine and comfortable(very peaceful), but the customer service by the so-called, concierge or \"experience something or the others\" left much to be desired. First, I arrived and the doorman walked me to the desk. I was not greeted with the usual \"Hello, welcome to...\". Instead, I got, \"Your name? ID?\" No, \"hello\", no \"welcome to the Amalfi Hotel,\" just plain old poor customer service from the very beginning! That left a very bad taste in my mouth, but I decided to let it go and see how the rest of my stay was.\n", -1, 0], [1029, "james", "I haven't actually stayed at this hotel- yet- but am already disappointed in their customer service. I visit Chicago quite often and usually stay at the InterContinental, but yesterday I read some online articles advertising The James Hotel's \"Cyber Monday Special\". The promo states that if you buy a gift certificate from their website, the hotel will match that amount in \"James Credits\" that can be used toward your stay. None of the articles gave an expiration date for these credits. My next trip to Chicago is in April, so I thought I'd give The James a try. I travel frequently with my pet and I've heard they have a very liberal pet-policy. So today I went online and bought a $500 certificate. Me, having the one track mind that I do, somehow missed the part about the credits expiring March 31, 2010. I realized my mistake immediately and called the hotel front desk to explain my predicament. I said I couldn't be in Chicago until April (I'm overseas on business until then), and asked if they could extend my credits an extra month, or it not, refund my gift certificate purchase. I had only just made the purchase minutes before and hadn't even recieved my email confirmation yet. Most businesses offer a 24 hr grace period. The girl at the front dest was extremely rude to me- basically saying \"too bad, it's your problem now\". She didn't even bother to act polite or pretend to be sympathetic about my situation at all. So now that I know this is the kind of service I can expect from The James, I might just call it a wash and stay at my usual hotel, or try Hotel Monaco. I hear they have great service and are good with pets too.\n", -1, 0], [1107, "palmer", "My husband and I and our 10 month old took a quick trip to Chicago. We stayed one night at The Palmer house after reading that they were a four star hotel. I guess I am just confused as to why they are a four star hotel. Yes the lounge area is nice but the rooms were so small I couldn't set up a pack and play for my son. I had to call and \"upgrade\" my room just so my son could have someplace to sleep. The lower levels have been updated which makes them slightly better than a Holiday Inn. The wall paper is peeling away from the walls and the shower was dirty. I will NEVER stay there again.\n", -1, 0], [1045, "knickerbocker", "Just returned from a one night stay at the Knickerbocker, and I will not return. It came nowhere near being worth the price I paid. Hotel Burnham is twice the hotel at half the price! The bathroom was unbelieveably small and smelled terribly. We had to call the front desk twice before towels that we requested were delivered (which frankly may as well have been paper towels, nothing plush about them at all). We didn't have enough pillows and when we requested an extra it was never delivered. Room service cart was left outside our door all night. All in all, it was a very disappointing stay. The only redeeming quality of this hotel seems to be its location. And for me, it's just not worth it.\n", -1, 0], [1129, "sheraton", "great bed, but when I first came in, I requested a room with a lake view (i requested this over the phone as well), and the front desk woman said \"this is a great room\". I go upstairs and its awful looking. The view was of the neighboring roofs. Then I spent half an hour trying to find a better room. Eventually I got a corner roof with a partial view. Horrible experience. also rooms were small and had crappy look (yellowy wallpaper and bedsheets)\n", -1, 0], [1128, "sheraton", "Firtly they took $372 off my card, even though they also took the same amount off of one of my friends for staying an extra night. They had no business taking the money off of my card. So on the 28th Sep I contacted them and they admited to the mistake. It is not a month later and I have called them about 6 times in all and they have still not paid it back. Secondly I booked 8 rooms at buy 2 get 3rd room free direct with hotel. When I looked a week later, they had only booked 7 and refused to offer me the rate 3rd room free rate, so two of my friends didn't come to the trip away. Thirdly I asked if the initial money for all rooms could be taken ASAP as the dollar was weak against the pound. After about 8 phone calls over 5 months (each saying they would) they eventually took the money and the whole trip cost an additional PS150. Overall, the hotel was nice and in a nice location, but I will never be staying there again due to all my problems.\n", -1, 0], [826, "allegro", "Me and my husband stayed in the Allegro Hotel Chicago for 4 days 3 nights recently. We got a room with a king size bed.. Although the room is small, we got no problems with that as there was enough space for our luggages & all. However, we felt that the bed is not exactly comfortable, the bed sheets kinda feel rough to us. The walls are really thin and we could hear our neighbours talking and occasionally the flushing sound. 1 of the days, our room was not cleaned till afternoon and so we went to check with the front desk and was told that we got to request for our room to be cleaned which was a shock to us as we thought that like all hotels, rooms are cleaned except when you put on the no disturb sign. The worst is upon returning to the hotel at night, we found a bag of our garbage in the room and it was right next to our luggage. The housekeeping people must have forgotten to take it out after cleaning our bins. This is unacceptable to us. The hotel is in the theatre district and it is rather quiet at night. Although it is near the CTA trains, i would rec one to stay somewhere close to the magnificent mile where its lively at night or hotels near the chicago river so that you can get a great view. Am staying again at a Kimpton hotel in San Fran next month and i am contemplating if i should change! Overall, not a good experience and i wouldnt choose this hotel again if i were to head to Chicago again!\n", -1, 0], [986, "hyatt", "The lines at the check in desk were tremendously long so we decided to use the computerized self check in. The only option the self check in gave us was the size of the bed. When we got to our room, we immediately realized we were placed in a smoking room but we were unable or perhaps the staff was unwilling to move us to a non smoking room. I am allergic to the smoke and that made my stay uncomfortable. The walls seemed thin and we could clearly hear the conversations of the guests in the rooms next to us. When we went to breakfast, we were seated quickly but it was nearly ten minutes before our server arrived. For the price they were charging, the wait was unacceptable and we went elsewhere. It also took ten extra minutes than promised for the valet to get our car. For forty dollars a day for parking, we expected better.\n", -1, 0], [845, "amalfi", "IMO the Amalfi doesnt come close to justifying the glowing comments on TA. This is basically a Holiday Inn. Half of the rooms overlook an alley / loading dock. The hotel is not more than 6 or 7 flors high and the garbage pick up woke me up daily at 5 am. At 530, when you are just nodding off again, they begin setting up for the complimentary breakfast. This is a continental buffet on every floor next to the elevator bank. Any room within 100 feet of the elevators will hear the noise. Reception was a bit tacky and the \"staff\" was a little rough around the edges. I didn't see a single business travellers while I was there. Valet parking was expensive (usual for Chicago) but was very slow. Just ok. Explore other options.\n", -1, 0], [969, "homewood", "I called the reservations line to book a room at the beginning of December 2012 for a rate with a local corporation. When I first made the reservation I did not get an e-mail confirmation. I had to call again to get the e-mail and then saw that I was booked in a handicapped accessible room which i did not need as there was me, my wife and three year old. I called the reservation line and asked for a regular room which they said was impossible at the rate I was at, however for ten dollars more I can upgrade to a regular room. I then asked what if a disabled person needs the room and he said he could not help me. i told them to cancel the room. based on the reservation experience, I did not want to run into anymore trouble at this hotel.\n", -1, 0], [887, "conrad", "I was expecting an experience comparable to my stays at the Olympia in Seattle. The decor and overall feel of the hotel was much above average but not inspiring. Biggest disappointment was the inadequate internet connection in the room. The wireless was very slow and the hard-wire from the wall did not work at all. I did request a replacement of the wall wire, but it did no help. This hotel can do better than this. With a 5 star rating, it should be an experience to be pleasantly remembered -- but, was just a mediocre experience for me. Even the bed covers were not that special. Needs more intense management. Next time, I will try the Trump facility Thanks\n", -1, 0], [1060, "knickerbocker", "I unfortunately stayed for 3 nights at the Knickerbocker Hotel ...I should have checked out on day 1. The bathrooms were filthy dirty with tangled hairs on the floor behind the door and after a few nights of scratching and the feeling of skin crawling...I pulled the bed away from the bedhead and watched as little rice sized brown bugs scurried over the white sheets...bed bugs! Which I might add the hotel are saying are flying insects from the windows being left open from when the window cleaners were there (fortunately I took photos to the contrary) Finding the bed bugs...I looked at the mattress protector and pillows and found long hairs on both...I was disgusted at the hygeine and would never stay again at this establishment.\n", -1, 0], [1175, "swissotel", "Just wanted to let everyone know if you are looking for a hotel with high rise construction next door the Swissotel Chicago is the one for you. My wife and I went there last year and there was just an empty lot next door, this year there is a loud construction site next door. So 8 am Saturday morning you will hear the workers starting. I am sure once the summer in Chicago comes around they will work all night. Just think as they keep adding floors you will be able to look the workers in the eye and wave from your room that used to have a view of the Navy Pier. Now you will get an up close and personal view of people pouring concrete. On top of it the hotel is doing construction of there own. The front of the hotel is block and lucky for us the protestors that are standing in front of the hotel were able to tell use where the new entrance was. The protestors were there because the Swissotel hired a company to redo their sound system that does not hire union workers. If you ask the workers about the noise and they say we can't hear it. I am sure the Swissotel does not want word getting out about this. If you insist on trying it for yourself don't pay for your room in advance they will not let you out of the room and then you are stuck.\n", -1, 0], [975, "homewood", "I booked this hotel for my family of 4 to stay overnight to see the Magnificent Mile Christmas Lights Parade. I chose it because it had a sofa sleeper and one bed. We arrived at our hotel around 3:30 PM to check in. We came at this time because the front desk worker said that we could not check in until 3:00 PM. After giving him our name, the manager said,\"OK, we have your king smoking suite available\". We quickly corrected him to let him know that we were traveling with two very young kids and we reserved a non-smoking room. He insisted that his computer said that we reserved a smoking room. We went back and forth, then he asked us if we had a copy of our reservation. Luckily, we were able to pull the reservation up on our phone. It clearly said non-smoking. After showing him our reservation, he explained that there was nothing that he could do to correct the situation because they had no other rooms available. So why in the world did he need to see our reservation!! We decided to see if we could handle the smoking room. It turns out that the entire floor was smoking and for a non smoker there was no way that we could sleep in a smoking room on a smoking floor with our two young children. The manager eventually called around and found a hampton inn near by with one bed. We canceled our room reservation. We live about an hour away from downtown so we made the late night trip back home. My family was very disappointed. My husband is a gold member with Hilton. Let's just say we will be switching back to Marriott. The hotel lobby was dated. The smoking room that I saw looked very dated as well. They made an error and never owned up to it, nor did they do anything to compensate us for such a huge inconvenience.\n", -1, 0]]